Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Tennessee Science and Technology Advisory Council [Repealed]

4-14-201 — 4-14-210. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§4-14-201 —4-14-210 (Acts 1993, ch. 355, §§ 1, 2), concerning the Tennessee science and technology advisory council, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 465, § 2, effective June 18, 2005.